Missouri, session 2026, HB2609.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.288, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.288, to read as follows:
67.288. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Electric vehicle", any vehicle that operates, either partially or exclusively, on
electrical energy from the grid or an off-board source that is stored onboard for a motive
purpose;
(2) "Electric vehicle charging station", a public or private parking space that is served
by battery charging station equipment that has as its primary purpose the transfer of electric
energy by conductive or inductive means to a battery or other energy storage device in an
electric vehicle.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any political
subdivision that adopts an ordinance, resolution, regulation, code, or policy that
requires installation of electric vehicle charging stations shall pay all costs associated
with the installation, maintenance, and operation of the electric vehicle charging
stations. No political subdivision shall adopt any ordinance, resolution, regulation, code,
or policy that requires more than five electric vehicle charging stations per parking lot
or infrastructure for future installation of more than five electric vehicle charging
stations per parking lot. Such ordinances, resolutions, regulations, codes, or policies
shall apply only to parking lots with more than thirty parking spaces designated for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2609 2
parking. No political subdivision shall adopt any ordinance, resolution, regulation, code, or
policy that requires electric vehicle charging stations or infrastructure for future installation of
electric vehicle charging stations on any parking lot owned or leased to any church or
nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Code of 1986, as amended.
3. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a business owner or property owner from
paying for the installation, maintenance, or operation of an electric vehicle charging station.
✔